Illinois, session 104th, SB653.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Veterans' Employment Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 25/1)  (from Ch. 126 1/2, par. 201)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Veterans' Employment Act.9(Source: P.A. 88-12.)